West Virginia, session 2026, SB911.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. §5B-2-7. First-time Drive to Work Pilot Program. (a) Creation of the First-time Drive to Work Pilot Program. – (1) The executive director of the Division of Economic Development Below shall establish the First-time Drive to Work Pilot Program to reduce transportation barriers for first-time vehicles buyers who are entering or participating in the workforce. (2) The executive director shall not create any new boards, offices, commissions, or other such entities to administer the pilot program. (3) The executive director may coordinate with financial institutions, licensed motor vehicle dealers, and insurance providers to implement this pilot program.(b) Eligibility requirements. – To be eligible for the pilot program an applicant must:(1) Be a resident of West Virginia;(2) Be between 18 and 30 years old at the time he or she submits an application;(3) Be a first-time vehicle purchaser with no prior vehicle financing or titling;  (4) Be employed in West Virginia or have a written offer of employment within the state of not less than 30 hours per week; (5) Have household income not exceeding 120 percent of the state median household income; (6) Certify the vehicle will be used primarily for transportation to and from employment; (7) Not have previously been accepted for the pilot program or received any payments under the pilot program; and (8) Agree to all other program requirements or restrictions set by the executive director.(c) Authorized assistance. – The pilot program may provide the following assistance:(1) Down-payment assistance of a one-time grant up to $1,500 per participant;(2) Temporary insurance assistance not to exceed $75 per month for a maximum of six months for a total assistance amount not to exceed $450 per applicant;(3) Limited loan guarantee of up to $5,000 per participant to cover no more than 50 percent of the outstanding loan balance that expires 12 months after loan origination;(4) The maximum amount a participant may receive is $6,950.(5) The pilot program cannot be used to make monthly vehicle payments on behalf of any participant.(d) Vehicle eligibility standards. – Eligible vehicles must:(1) Have a purchase price less than $20,000;(2) Be less than 10 model years old at the time of purchase;(3) Have less than 120,000 miles; (4) Pass a state safety inspection prior to delivery; and (5) Be titled in the participant’s name.(e) Prohibition on transfer or sale of vehicle. – Vehicles purchased under the pilot program may not be sold or transferred for 24 months after participant is accepted into the pilot program  except in hardship circumstances approved by the division.(f) Loan Default and State Liability. – In the event of a default on the vehicle loan on the behalf of a pilot program participant: (1) The state’s liability is limited solely to the loan guarantee amount;(2) The state is not responsible for any portion of the loan beyond the guaranteed amount;(3) The state has no obligation to pursue collection or repossession or recovery of the vehicle; (4) Any payment made pursuant to a loan guarantee fully satisfies the state’s obligation for the vehicle loan; and (5) Pursuant to subsection (c), the state does not have any liability or duty on the vehicle loan 12 months after the participant receives such assistance. (g) Pilot program fiscal and participant limits. – The pilot program is limited to $5 million per year and no more than 750 participants. The division shall award eligible participants on a first-come, first-served basis. (h) Rulemaking. – The executive director may propose rules pursuant to §29B-3-1 et seq. for the limited scope of the administration and implementation of this pilot program. Any proposed rule may not expand eligibility, increase the type or amount of assistance, or extend the duration or scope of the state's liability. (i) Reporting. – By January 1 of each year the executive director shall report to the Joint Committee on Government and Finance the following information: (1) The number of participants;(2) The total assistance provided;(3) Loan performance and default rates; (4) Employment retention outcomes of participants;  (5) Recommendations for continuation or modification; and(6) Any other information that may be requested by the Joint Committee on Government and Finance.  (j) Sunset provision. – This pilot program terminates five years after its effective date. No new applications may be accepted after the sunset date.(k) Effective date. – The First-time Drive to Work Pilot Program becomes effective July 1, 2026.